Washington statutes.
RCW 35.66.020

Appointment.

The police matron or matrons employed or appointed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be employed or appointed in the same manner as other regular members of the police departments in the city where the appointment is made.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.66.020. Prior: 1939 c 115 s 1; 1893 c 15 s 4; RRS s 9285.] [SLC-RO-4]